Tennessee, session 114, HB2271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-1-206(a), is amended by deleting
"members of the general assembly" and substituting "governor and each member of the general
assembly".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-1-206(e), is amended by deleting
"all members of the general assembly" and substituting "the governor and each member of the
general assembly".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2271
012381
- 1 -